Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-130
Replacement bond; blank bond; printing authorized.

When any of the issuing bodies described in section 10-127 issues bonds or other evidences of indebtedness after April 30, 1971, such body may cause to be printed a sufficient number of blank bonds or other evidences of indebtedness as it shall deem necessary to provide for future requirements with respect to the issuance of replacement bonds or other evidences of indebtedness.

Laws 1971, LB 873, § 4.